Connecticut, session 2026, HB05490.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17a-716 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Sober living home" means an alcohol-free and drug-free
residence where (A) unrelated adults who are recovering from a
substance use disorder choose to live together in a supportive
environment during their recovery, and (B) no formal substance use
disorder treatment services are provided; and
(2) "Operator" means the lawful owner of a sober living home or a
person designated by such lawful owner to have primary responsibility
for the daily operation of such sober living home.
(b) An operator of a sober living home that is certified as a recovery
sHB5490 / File No. 600 1

sHB5490 File No. 600
residence by an affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery
Residences, or a successor organization, or another organization
recognized by the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
as an organization responsible for certifying sober living homes in the
state, [may] shall (1) report the sober living home's certified status to the
Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services, [provided such
operator maintains at least] (2) provide the department with the name
and contact information for any individual who is responsible for
oversight of the daily operations of the sober living home, (3) maintain
not less than two doses of opioid antagonists, as defined in section 17a-
714a, on the premises [and provides] for each individual residing at the
sober living home, (4) provide annual training to all of its residents in
the administration of an opioid antagonist when such home is occupied
by at least one resident who has been diagnosed with opioid use
disorder, [. An operator of a sober living home that reports its certified
status to the department shall] and (5) provide the department with the
number of beds available in the sober living home at the time of its
report and weekly thereafter. [The department shall post on its Internet
web site a list of the sober living homes that have reported their certified
status pursuant to this section and the number of beds available at each
such sober living home. The department shall update the list of sober
living homes and the bed availability at each sober living home on a
weekly basis.]
(c) In addition, on or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter,
the operator of a sober living home that is certified as a recovery
residence by an affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery
Residences, or a successor organization, or another organization
recognized by the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
as an organization responsible for certifying sober living homes in the
state, shall report to the Department of Mental Health and Addiction
Services and the chief elected official of the municipality in which the
sober living house is located on the following:
(1) The total bed capacity of the sober living home;
sHB5490 / File No. 600 2

sHB5490 File No. 600
(2) The average number of individuals residing at the sober living
home on a daily basis during the prior calendar year;
(3) The average number of staff employed by the sober living home
on a daily basis during the prior calendar year;
(4) The professional licensure or certification credentials of any staff
employed at the sober living home;
(5) The type of professional training provided to staff on an annual
basis, including, but not limited to, training on the administration of
opioid antagonists, as defined in section 17a-714a;
(6) Whether criminal history records checks are required of the staff
at the sober living home;
(7) The quantity of opioid antagonists maintained and available on a
daily basis for use at the sober living home;
(8) The name of the individual or entity that owns the sober living
home;
(9) The level of professional liability insurance maintained by the
individual or entity that owns the sober living home;
(10) The number of sinks, toilets, showers and bathtubs available to
individuals residing at the sober living home; and
(11) Copies of any citations alleging a violation of the Public Health
Code, the State Building Code, the Fire Safety Code or a municipal code,
as defined in section 8-169aa, received by the sober living home during
the time period covered by the report.
(d) The department shall post on its Internet web site a list of the sober
living homes that have reported their certified status pursuant to this
section and the number of beds available at each such sober living home.
The department shall update the list of sober living homes and the bed
availability at each sober living home on a weekly basis.
sHB5490 / File No. 600 3

sHB5490 File No. 600
[(c)] (e) No operator of a sober living home shall (1) advertise or
represent that a sober living home is a facility that is certified or licensed
to provide substance use disorder treatment services, [or] (2) publish
any claims of particular outcomes for individuals residing in such
homes, or (3) without the consent of an individual residing at a sober
living home, disclose personally identifiable information to any other
person if such disclosure would constitute a violation of federal law,
including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-191) (HIPAA), as amended from
time to time. Any Internet web site or publication maintained by a sober
living home shall include a clear and conspicuous statement in bold
typeface that the sober living home (A) is not licensed or certified to
provide substance use disorder treatment services, and (B) is a type of
housing in which individuals recovering from a substance use disorder
voluntarily choose to live together in a supportive environment during
their recovery. Any violation of the provisions of this subsection shall
constitute an unfair trade practice pursuant to section 42-110b.
[(d) On or before August 1, 2018, the] (f) The commissioner shall
create a printable one-page disclosure form for distribution to
prospective sober living home residents. Such disclosure form shall (1)
be written in plain language and in an easily readable format, (2) state
that sober living homes are not licensed or certified to provide substance
use disorder treatment services, (3) provide information on sober living
homes and resources for individuals recovering from a substance use
disorder, and (4) contain a signature line on which a prospective
resident may sign the form. Such disclosure form shall be made
100 available to the public on the department's Internet web site. The
101 commissioner shall review and update such disclosure form as
102 necessary.
103 [(e)] (g) The Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
104 may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
105 to implement the provisions of this section.
sHB5490 / File No. 600 4

sHB5490 File No. 600
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17a-716
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(c)(11), commas were added for proper form.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5490 / File No. 600 5

sHB5490 File No. 600
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Mental Health & Addiction GF - Cost at least at least
Serv., Dept. $100,000 $100,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost of at least $100,000 to the Department of
Mental Health and Addiction Services (DMHAS) associated with
reporting requirements for sober living homes. Costs reflect increased
contract costs to expand the current work done by Advanced Behavioral
Health around the sober house network.
Under current law, certified sober living homes are allowed but not
required to report their certified status to DMHAS, provided such
homes maintain at least two doses of an opioid antagonist and train all
residents when at least one resident has an opioid use disorder. The bill
requires all homes to report on their certified status, name and contact
information for anyone responsible for daily oversight and provide a
weekly report on bed availability.1 The bill also requires homes to
annually report to DMHAS, beginning by 1/1/27, various information
including the average daily number of residents and staff, professional
or certification credentials of staff and any training provided
throughout the year, the quantity of opioid antagonists maintained and
As under current law, DMHAS must post and update the list of reported sober living
homes and associated bed availability on their website on a weekly basis.
sHB5490 / File No. 600 6

sHB5490 File No. 600
available on a daily basis, the number of sinks, toilets, showers, and
bathtubs available to residents, and copies of any citations related to
public health, building, fire, or municipal code violations.
To the extent DMHAS is required to verify
that sober living homes are meeting the requirements of the bill, the
agency will incur additional staffing and contract costs.
The bill also adds a provision to an existing unfair trade practice
violation concerning sober living homes resulting in no fiscal impact to
the state. The Department of Consumer Protection investigates these
violations and has the resources and expertise to meet the requirements
of the bill.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sHB5490 / File No. 600 7

sHB5490 File No. 600
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5490
AN ACT CONCERNING REQUIREMENTS FOR SOBER LIVING
HOMES OPERATING IN THE STATE.